Texas, session 892, HB198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 11.0581(a), Education Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  An election for trustees of an independent school district shall be held on the same date as the general election for state and county officers[: [(1)  the election for the members of the governing body of a municipality located in the school district; [(2)  the general election for state and county officers; [(3)  the election for the members of the governing body of a hospital district, if the school district: [(A)  is wholly or partly located in a county with a population of less than 50,000 that is adjacent to a county with a population of more than three million; and [(B)  held its election for trustees jointly with the election for the members of the governing body of the hospital district before May 2007; or [(4)  the election for the members of the governing board of a public junior college district in which the school district is wholly or partly located]. SECTION 2.  Sections 11.059(a), (b), (c), and (d), Education Code, are amended to read as follows: (a)  A trustee of an independent school district serves a term of [three or] four years. (b)  [Elections for trustees with three-year terms shall be held annually.  The terms of one-third of the trustees, or as near to one-third as possible, expire each year. [(c)]  Elections for trustees [with four-year terms] shall be held biennially.  The terms of one-half of the trustees, or as near to one-half as possible, expire every two years. (c) [(d)]  A board policy must state the schedule on which specific terms expire. SECTION 3.  Section 11.065(a), Education Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  Sections 11.052(g) and (h) [and Sections 11.059(a) and (b)] do not apply to the board of trustees of a school district if: (1)  the district's central administrative office is located in a county with a population of more than 2.5 million; and (2)  the district's student enrollment is more than 125,000 and less than 200,000. SECTION 4.  Section 41.0052, Election Code, is amended by adding Subsection (a-4) to read as follows: (a-4)  The governing body of an independent school district that holds its general election for officers on a date other than the date of the general election for state and county officers shall, not later than December 31, 2026, change the date on which the governing body holds its general election for officers to that date.  This subsection expires January 1, 2029. SECTION 5.  The following provisions are repealed: (1)  Section 11.054, Education Code; (2)  Section 11.059(e), Education Code, as amended by H.B. No. 3546, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025; and (3)  Section 11.065(c), Education Code. SECTION 6.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.